Missouri, session 2026, SB1716.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 393.135 and 393.150, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 393.135 and 393.150, to read as follows:
393.135. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, any charge made or demanded by an electrical
corporation for service, or in connection therewith, which
is based on the costs of construction in progress upon any
existing or new facility of the electrical corporation, or
any other cost associated with owning, operating,
maintaining, or financing any property before it is fully
operational and used for service, is unjust and
unreasonable, and is prohibited.
2. [(1) An electrical corporation may be permitted,
subject to the limitations in this subsection, to include
construction work in progress for any new natural gas-
generating unit in rate base. The inclusion of construction
work in progress allowed under this subsection shall be in
lieu of any otherwise applicable allowance for funds used
during construction that would have accrued from and after
the effective date of new base rates that reflect inclusion
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1716 2
of the construction work in progress in rate base. The
commission shall determine, in a proceeding under section
393.170, the amount of construction work in progress that
may be included in rate base. The amount shall be limited
by:
(a) The estimated cost of such project; and
(b) Project expenditures made within the estimated
construction period for such project.] Base rate recoveries
arising from inclusion of construction work in progress in
rate base are subject to refund, with interest on the
refunded amount at the same rate as the rate of interest for
delinquent taxes determined by the director of revenue in
accordance with section 32.065, if, and to the extent the
commission determines, in a subsequent complaint or general
rate proceeding, that construction costs giving rise to the
construction work in progress included in rate base were
imprudently incurred or [if the project for which
construction costs have been included in the rate base is
not placed in service within a reasonable amount of time, as
determined by the commission] otherwise unreasonable. Rate
base used to determine return deferred under subdivision (2)
of subsection 3 of section 393.1400 shall include an offset
for rate base that has been used to determine return
included in base rates as a result of construction work in
progress inclusion in rate base under this subsection. The
offset shall apply from and after the in-service date of the
asset that has been used to determine return included in
base rates as a result of construction work in progress
inclusion in rate base under this subsection.
[(2) This subsection shall expire on December 31,
2035, unless the commission determines, after a hearing
conducted in 2035, upon a submission from an electrical

SB 1716 3
corporation of an application requesting and demonstrating
that good cause exists to extend the effectiveness of this
subsection through December 31, 2045. The secretary of the
commission shall notify the revisor of statutes when the
conditions set forth for the extension of this subsection
have been met.]
393.150. 1. Whenever there shall be filed with the
commission by any gas corporation, electrical corporation,
water corporation or sewer corporation any schedule stating
a new rate or charge, or any new form of contract or
agreement, or any new rule, regulation or practice relating
to any rate, charge or service or to any general privilege
or facility, the commission shall have, and it is hereby
given, authority, either upon complaint or upon its own
initiative without complaint, at once, and if it so orders
without answer or other formal pleading by the interested
gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation
or sewer corporation, but upon reasonable notice, to enter
upon a hearing concerning the propriety of such rate,
charge, form of contract or agreement, rule, regulation or
practice, and pending such hearing and the decision thereon,
the commission upon filing with such schedule, and
delivering to the gas corporation, electrical corporation,
water corporation or sewer corporation affected thereby, a
statement in writing of its reasons for such suspension, may
suspend the operation of such schedule and defer the use of
such rate, charge, form of contract or agreement, rule,
regulation or practice, but not for a longer period than one
hundred and twenty days beyond the time when such rate,
charge, form of contract or agreement, rule, regulation or
practice would otherwise go into effect; and after full
hearing, whether completed before or after the rate, charge,

SB 1716 4
form of contract or agreement, rule, regulation or practice
goes into effect, the commission may make such order in
reference to such rate, charge, form of contract or
agreement, rule, regulation or practice as would be proper
in a proceeding initiated after the rate, charge, form of
contract or agreement, rule, regulation or practice had
become effective. In any proceeding under this section
wherein testimony is prefiled, each party shall be afforded
an opportunity to respond to any rebuttal testimony and
exhibits of other parties through prefiled testimony.
2. If any such hearing cannot be concluded within the
period of suspension, as above stated, the commission may,
in its discretion, extend the time of suspension for a
further period not exceeding six months, the last day of
which period shall be considered the operation of law date.
At any hearing involving a rate sought to be increased, the
burden of proof to show that the increased rate or proposed
increased rate is just and reasonable shall be upon the gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation or
sewer corporation, and the commission shall give to the
hearing and decision of such questions preference over all
other questions pending before it and decide the same as
speedily as possible.
3. [(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, the test year for
proceedings under this section shall, if requested by a gas
corporation, water corporation, or sewer corporation, be a
future year consisting of the first twelve full calendar
months after the operation of law date determined in
subsections 1 and 2 of this section for schedules stating
new base rates filed by a gas corporation, water
corporation, or sewer corporation under this section, unless
the commission makes a determination that using a future

SB 1716 5
test year under this section is detrimental to the public
interest. For ratemaking purposes, the average of the
projected month-end total rate base amount during the future
test year shall be used to establish new base rates. Unless
otherwise ordered by the commission, new base rates shall
not go into effect before the first day of the future test
year.
(2) With respect to gas corporations, water
corporations, or sewer corporations that elect to utilize a
future test year and notwithstanding section 393.270 to the
contrary, within forty-five days of the end of the future
test year, such gas corporation, water corporation, or sewer
corporation shall update its base rates that were approved
by the commission in its report and order issued under
subsections 1 and 2 of this section to reflect the total
rate base, annualized depreciation expense, income tax
expense, payroll expense, employee benefits (other than
pensions and other post-retirement benefits), and rate case
expense at the end of the future test year. The total
ending rate base and expense items reflected in this update
shall not be greater than the total ending rate base and
expense items approved by the commission in its report and
order establishing base rates. The commission and parties
to the case shall have sixty days to review the updated
information provided by a gas corporation, water
corporation, or sewer corporation, unless any party who was
a party to the rate case files a request for a hearing at
which point the commission shall suspend the filed tariffs
and order a procedural schedule. The commission shall order
the corporation to file new tariff sheets that reflect any
update approved by the commission.

SB 1716 6
4. A gas corporation, water corporation, or sewer
corporation that requests a test year under subsection 3 of
this section shall not recover the costs of any plant
investments made during the test year period under any of
the mechanisms provided for in section 393.1000, 393.1003,
393.1006, 393.1009, 393.1012, 393.1015, 393.1500, 393.1503,
393.1506, or 393.1509.
5. For a gas corporation, water corporation, or sewer
corporation that elected to use a future test year, a
reconciliation of the rate base at the end of the future
100 test year shall be provided to the commission within forty-
101 five days of the end of the future test year. If the actual
102 average month-end total rate base amount during the future
103 test year is less than the average month-end total rate base
104 amount used to set base rates in the prior general rate
105 proceeding under subsections 1 and 2 of this section, and
106 notwithstanding section 393.270 to the contrary, the portion
107 of the annual revenue requirement comprising the average
108 total rate base difference shall be returned to customers.
109 The revenue requirement shall be calculated using rate base,
110 depreciation expense, income tax expense, and the pretax
111 rate of return from the prior general rate proceeding under
112 subsections 1 and 2 of this section. The difference in
113 revenue requirement shall be placed into a regulatory
114 liability to be returned to customers in the next general
115 rate proceeding with such regulatory liability to accrue
116 carrying costs at the utility's weighted average cost of
117 capital.
118 6.] The commission may take into account any change in
119 business risk to the corporation resulting from
120 implementation of [the] any adjustment mechanism in setting
121 the corporation's allowed return in any rate proceeding, in

SB 1716 7
122 addition to any other changes in business risk experienced
123 by the corporation.
124 [7. For a gas corporation, water corporation, or sewer
125 corporation that elected to use a future test year, a
126 reconciliation of depreciation expense, income tax expense,
127 payroll expense, employee benefits except for pensions and
128 other postretirement benefits, and rate case expense
129 incurred during the future test year shall be provided to
130 the commission within forty-five days of the end of the
131 future test year. If the actual amounts for these expenses
132 are less than the amounts used to calculate the revenue
133 requirement in the prior general rate proceeding under
134 subsections 1 and 2 of this section, and notwithstanding
135 section 393.270 to the contrary, the differences shall be
136 returned to customers. The difference in revenue
137 requirement shall be placed into a regulatory liability to
138 be returned to customers in the next general rate case with
139 such regulatory liability to accrue carrying costs at the
140 utility's weighted average cost of capital. Expense
141 differences to be returned to customers resulting from this
142 reconciliation shall not be used to offset additional
143 capital spending in the reconciliation described in
144 subsection 5 of this section.
145 8. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
146 the provisions of this section no later than July 1, 2027.
147 Such rules shall include a procedure allowing any party to a
148 rate proceeding that utilizes a future test year as provided
149 in subsection 3 of this section to undertake a meaningful
150 review of the update provided by the gas corporation, water
151 corporation, or sewer corporation under subsection 3 of this
152 section and the reconciliations provided by the gas
153 corporation, water corporation, or sewer corporation under

SB 1716 8
154 subsections 5 and 7 of this section, and to argue for the
155 disallowance of any costs included in the total rate base,
156 depreciation expense, income tax expense, payroll expense,
157 employee benefits (other than pensions and other
158 postretirement benefits), and rate case expense at the end
159 of the future test year that differs from the projected
160 values upon which the commission relied in issuing its
161 report and order to approve new base rates under subsections
162 1 and 2 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
163 that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
164 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
165 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
166 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
167 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
168 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
169 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
170 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
171 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
172 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
173 2025, shall be invalid and void.
174 9.] 4. For purposes of this section, the following
175 terms shall mean:
176 (1) "Base rates", rates or charges for public utility
177 service other than rates or charges under any rate
178 adjustment mechanism including, but not limited to, those
179 approved under the provisions of sections 386.266, 393.1000,
180 393.1009, 393.1030, 393.1075, and 393.1500;
181 (2) "Revenue requirement", the amount of retail
182 revenues from base rates charged to retail customers for
183 public utility service needed for a public utility to
184 recover its cost to provide utility service including

SB 1716 9
185 reasonable and necessary expenses, prudent investments, and
186 the cost of capital.
✓